en: Cooked leeks
fr: Poireaux cuits

en: Fresh leeks
es: Puerro fresco
fr: Poireaux frais
hr: Svježi poriluk
nl: Verse prei

en: Lettuces, lettuce
af: Blaarslaai
am: ሰላጣ
an: Ensalada
ar: خس
az: Süddəyən, Kahı
ba: Латук
be: Латук
bg: Маруля
bn: লেটুস
bo: རྗེན་ཚལ་
ca: Lletuga, enciam
cs: locika setá, locika
cy: letysen
da: Salat
de: Lattich, Gartensalat
eo: kultiva, ĝardena laktuko
es: Lechuga, Lechugas
et: Salat, Aedsalat
eu: Uraza, uhaza, letxuga
fa: لاکتوکا, کاهو
fi: salaatit, Lehtisalaatti
fr: Laitues, laitue
ga: Leitís
gl: Leituga
gr: Μαρούλι
gu: Ka'anakyrỹi
gv: Glassyr
he: חסה, חסה תרבותית
hr: Salate, Salata, Zelene salate, Zelena salata
ht: Leti
hu: saláta, kerti saláta
hy: հազար
id: Selada
io: Latugo
is: Salat
it: Lattuga, lattughe
ja: アキノノゲシ属, レタス
ka: ღორისქადა, სალათა
kk: Ассүттіген, Салат, Salat latwk, سالات لاتۋك
kn: ಲೆಟಿಸ್
ko: 왕고들빼기속, 상추
ku: Kahû
ky: Сүттикен
la: Lactuca, Lactuca sativa
lt: Salota, salotos
lv: Dārza salāti
mk: Зелена салата
ml: ഉർവച്ചീര
ms: Salad
my: ဆလတ်ပင်
nb: Salater
nl: sla
nn: hagesalat, hodesalat
os: Къæсула
pa: ਸਲਾਦ
pl: sałata, Sałata siewna
pt: alface
qu: Pilliyuyu, lichuwa
ro: salată
ru: Латук, Салат
rw: Imboga za leti
sc: Lattuca
sh: Zelena salata
si: සලාද
sr: зелена салата
sv: Sallatsläktet, Sallat
ta: இலைக்கோசு
th: สกุลผักกาดหอม, ผักกาดหอม
tl: Letsugas
to: Lētisilau
tr: Marul
ug: ظوسذث
uk: Латук, Салат
uz: Salat
vi: Chi Rau diếp, Xà lách
wa: Salåde
za: byaekaengjgwx
zh: 莴苣属, 萵苣

en: Romaine lettuce, cos, romaine lettuce
fr: Laitue romaine
hr: Romaine salata
ja: ロメインレタス, コスレタス
nl: Romainesla

en: Iceberg lettuce
bg: Салата айсберг
ca: enciam iceberg
da: Icebergsalat, issalat, iceberg-salat
de: Eisbergsalat
eo: glacilaktuko
es: lechuga iceberg, iceberg
fi: jäävuorisalaatti
fr: Laitue iceberg, iceberg
hr: Ledena salata
hu: jégsaláta
it: insalata iceberg, lattuga iceberg
la: Lactuca sativa var. capitata
nb: isbergsalat
nl: IJsbergsla
pt: alface americana
sv: Isbergssallad, isbergssallat

en: Frillice iceberg lettuces, Frillice lettuces
sv: Krispsallader, Krispsallad

en: Onions, onion
bg: Лук
bn: পিঁয়াজ
ca: ceba
cs: cibule
cy: Nionyn
da: Løg
de: Zwiebeln, Zwiebel
el: κρεμμύδι
eo: cepo
es: Cebollas, Cebolla
et: sibul
eu: tipula
fi: sipuli
fr: Oignons, oignon
hr: luka, luk
io: Onyono
it: cipolle, Cipolla
ja: タマネギ
lt: svogūnai, svogūnas
lv: sīpoli
nb: løk
nl: Uien, Ui
nv: tłʼohchin
pl: cebula
pt: cebola
ru: лук
sv: Lökar, Lök
tr: soğan
vi: hành tây
zh: 洋葱

en: Fresh onions
da: Friske løg
de: Frische Zwiebeln
es: Cebollas frescas
fr: Oignons frais
he: בצלים טריים
hr: Svježi luk
nl: Verse uien
sv: Färska lökar

en: Yellow onions, yellow onion
de: gelbe Zwiebel
fi: Keltasipulit, keltasipuli, keltainen sipuli
fr: Oignons jaunes, oignon jaune
hr: Žuti luk
nl: Gele uien

en: Fresh yellow onions
nl: Verse gele uien

en: White onions, white onion
bg: Бял лук
de: Weiße Zwiebeln
fr: Oignons blancs, oignon blanc
hr: Bijeli luk
nl: Witte uien

en: Fresh white onions
fr: Oignons blancs frais
hr: Svježi bijeli luk
nl: Verse witte uien

en: Red onions, red onion, purple onions, Bombay onions
bg: Червен лук
de: Rote Zwiebeln
fi: Punasipulit
fr: Oignons rouges, oignon rouge
hr: Crveni luk
ja: 赤たまねぎ, 紫たまねぎ
nl: Rode uien
sv: Rödlökar

en: Fresh red onions
fr: Oignons rouges frais
hr: Svježi crveni luk
nl: Verse rode uien
sv: Färska rödlökar

en: Cooked onions
da: Kokte løg
fr: Oignons cuits
hr: Kuhani luk
nl: Gekookte uien
sv: Kokade lökar

en: Shallots
da: Skalotteløg
de: Schalotten
es: Echalotes, Chalotas, Escalonias
fi: Salottisipulit
fr: Échalotes, Echalotes
hr: Ljutika
ja: エシャロット
la: Allium cepa var. aggregatum, Allium ascalonicum
nl: Sjalotjes
sv: Schalottenlökar, Schallottenlök

en: Fresh shallots
da: Friske skalotteløg
fr: Échalotes fraîches
hr: Svježa ljutika
nl: Verse sjalotjes
sv: Färska schalottenlökar

en: Cooked shallots
da: Kokte skalotteløg
fr: Échalotes cuites
hr: Kuhana ljutika
nl: Gekookte sjalotjes
sv: Kokade schalottenlökar

fr: Echalote d'Anjou
nl: Sjalotten uit Anjou

en: Sweet peppers, Bell peppers
bg: Чушки
da: Peberfrugter
de: Paprika, Süße Pfeffer
es: Pimientos
fi: Makea paprikat
fr: Poivrons, Poivron, piment doux, Piment Poivron
hr: Slatke paprike
ja: ピーマン
la: Capsicum annuum
nl: Paprikas